District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2919

Issuance of licenses based on reports of boards; examination papers open to inspection; retention of papers; record of licenses issued; numbering of licenses; display

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(e), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1301 to 2-1343.